North Dakota statutes. TITLE 65 Workforce Safety and Insurance
CHAPTER 65-05 Claims and Compensation
65-05-09.4.
Additional benefit payable.

If an injured employee’s benefits cease under subsection 2 of section 65-05-09.3, the organization shall pay to that employee every twenty-eight days a benefit based on the length of time the injured employee received disability benefits during the term of that claim. The organization shall pay the injured employee’s additional benefits until the employee’s death or for a period of time not to exceed the total length of time the employee received disability benefits under sections 65-05-08, 65-05-08.1, 65-05-09, and 65-05-10, and a vocational rehabilitation allowance under chapter 65-05.1, for that claim, whichever occurs first. The benefit is based on the injured employee’s compensation rate before any applicable social security offset. The percentage of that final payment payable as the additional benefit is:

At least 1 year and less than 3 years of disability 5 percent of weekly benefit. At least 3 years and less than 5 years of disability 10 percent of weekly benefit. At least 5 years and less than 7 years of disability 15 percent of weekly benefit. At least 7 years and less than 9 years of disability 20 percent of weekly benefit. At least 9 years and less than 11 years of disability 25 percent of weekly benefit. At least 11 years and less than 13 years of disability 30 percent of weekly benefit. At least 13 years and less than 15 years of disability 35 percent of weekly benefit. At least 15 years and less than 17 years of disability 40 percent of weekly benefit. At least 17 years and less than 20 years of disability 45 percent of weekly benefit. Twenty or more years of disability 50 percent of weekly benefit.

Click to view

However, the organization shall pay to an injured employee who has been determined to be catastrophically injured as defined by subdivision c of subsection 2 of section 65-05.1-06.1 an additional benefit, until the death of the employee, equal to one hundred percent of the final payment of the disability benefit that was discontinued under subsection 2 or 3 of section 65-05-09.3.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 543, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 608, § 1.

65-05-09.5.
Additional benefit payable — Alternative calculation.

This section applies to an injured employee who has a claim for which:

A compensable injury was incurred before August 1, 1995;

The date of first disability or the date of successful reapplication under subsection 1 of section 65-05-08 was after July 31, 1995; and

The injured employee received a determination of permanent and total disability before August 1, 2007.

An injured employee who meets the requirements of subsection 1 is entitled to an alternative calculation of additional benefits payable instead of the calculation provided for under section 65-05-09.4. For the limited purpose of this alternative calculation, the organization shall use the calculation established under section 65-05-09.4 and shall consider that the injured employee’s pre-August 1, 1995, date of injury is also the injured employee’s date of first disability.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 570, § 2.

65-05-10.
Partial disability — Weekly benefit.

If the injury causes temporary partial disability resulting in decrease of earning capacity, the disability benefit is sixty-six and two-thirds percent of the difference between the injured employee’s average weekly wage and the injured employee’s wage-earning capacity after the injury in the same or another employment. Partial disability benefits are subject to a maximum of one hundred twenty-five percent of the average weekly wage in the state. The combined partial disability benefits, dependency allowance, and postinjury wage-earning capacity may not exceed ninety percent of the average weekly wage of the injured employee.

The benefits provided by this section are available to any otherwise eligible worker, providing the loss of earning capacity occurs after July 1, 1989. Partial loss of earning capacity occurring prior to July 1, 1989, must be paid at a rate to be fixed by the organization.

Benefits must be paid during the continuance of partial disability, not to exceed a period of five years. The organization may waive the five-year limit on the duration of partial disability benefits in cases of catastrophic injury as defined in section 65-05.1-06.1 or when the injured worker is working and has long-term restrictions verified by clear and convincing objective medical and vocational evidence that limits the injured worker to working less than twenty-eight hours per week because of the compensable work injury. This subsection is effective for partial loss of earnings capacity occurring after June 30, 1991.

The employee’s earnings capacity may be established by expert vocational evidence of a capacity to earn in the statewide job pool where the worker lives. Actual postinjury earnings are presumptive evidence of earnings capacity if the job employs the employee to full work capacity in terms of hours worked per week, and if the job is in a field related to the employee’s transferable skills. The presumption may be rebutted by competent evidence from a vocational expert that the employee’s actual earnings do not fairly reflect the employee’s earnings capacity in the statewide job pool, considering the employee’s capabilities, education, experience, and skills.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 3, subs. D; 1921, ch. 141, § 1, subs. D; 1925, ch. 223, § 1, subs. D; 1925 Supp., § 396a3, subs. D; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1, subs. D; 1929, ch. 260, § 1, subs. D; R.C. 1943, § 65-0510; S.L. 1945, ch. 337, § 3; 1957 Supp., § 65-0510; S.L. 1967, ch. 484, § 4; 1989, ch. 770, § 3; 1991, ch. 714, § 47; 1993, ch. 45, § 23; 1997, ch. 542, § 5; 1999, ch. 556, § 3; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 562, § 6; 2009, ch. 619, § 4; 2015, ch. 480, § 3, effective August 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 525, § 7, effective July 1, 2019; 2021, ch. 500, § 7, effective August 1, 2021.

Note.

Section 13 of chapter 500, S.L. 2021, provides in part, “

APPLICATION.

This Act applies to all claims regardless of date of injury.”

Section 10 of chapter 525, S.L. 2019 provides, “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 2, 4, 6, 7, and 8 of this Act apply to all claims regardless of date of injury.”

65-05-10.1.
Long-term temporary partial disability inflation adjustment.

This benefit only applies to claims with a date of first disability or date of successful reapplication occurring after June 30, 1991. For these claims, beginning on the first day of July immediately following the fifth full year of partial disability and every year thereafter, an injured employee who has received a waiver of the five-year cap on partial disability benefits under section 65-05-10 is eligible for a lump sum inflation adjustment. The organization shall calculate the lump sum inflation adjustment under this section on July first of each year by multiplying the previous year’s percent increase in the state’s average weekly wage, if any, by the total amount of partial disability payments paid to the injured employee in the preceding twelve months, including the preceding year’s inflationary adjustment award.

Source:

S.L. 2007, ch. 572, § 1.

65-05-11.
Maximum and minimum compensation allowances — Total and partial disability. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 558, § 6.

65-05-12.
Permanent impairment — Compensation — Time paid. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 624, § 2.

65-05-12.1.
Permanent impairment. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 624, § 2.

65-05-12.2.
Permanent impairment — Compensation — Time paid.

A permanent impairment is not intended to be a periodic payment and is not intended to reimburse the employee for specific expenses related to the injury or wage loss. If a compensable injury causes permanent impairment, the organization shall determine a permanent impairment award on the following terms:

The organization shall calculate the amount of the award by multiplying thirty-five percent of the average weekly wage in this state on the date of the impairment evaluation, rounded to the next highest dollar, by the permanent impairment multiplier specified in subsection 10.

The organization shall notify the employee by certified mail, to the last-known address of the employee, when that employee becomes potentially eligible for a permanent impairment award. After the organization has notified the employee, the employee shall file, within one hundred eighty days from the date the employee was notified, a written request for an evaluation for permanent impairment. Failure to file the written request within the one hundred eighty-day period precludes an award under this section.

An injured employee is entitled to compensation for permanent impairment under this section only for those findings of impairment that are permanent and which were caused by the compensable injury. The organization may not issue an impairment award for impairment findings due to unrelated, noncompensable, or pre-existing conditions, even if these conditions were made symptomatic by the compensable work injury, and regardless of whether section 65-05-15 applies to the claim.

An injured employee is eligible for an evaluation of permanent impairment only when all conditions caused by the compensable injury have reached maximum medical improvement. The injured employee’s doctor shall report to the organization the date an employee has reached maximum medical improvement and any evidence of impairment of function the injured employee has after that date. If the report states that the employee is potentially eligible for a permanent impairment award, the organization shall conduct a review and provide notice to the employee as provided by subsection 2. If the injured employee files a timely written request under subsection 2, the organization shall schedule an impairment evaluation by a doctor qualified to evaluate the impairment.

A health care provider evaluating permanent impairment shall include a clinical report in sufficient detail to support the percentage ratings assigned. The organization shall adopt administrative rules governing the evaluation of permanent impairment. These rules must incorporate principles and practices of the sixth edition of the American medical association’s “Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment” modified to be consistent with North Dakota law, to resolve issues of practice and interpretation, and to address areas not sufficiently covered by the guides. Subject to rules adopted under this subsection, impairments must be evaluated under the sixth edition of the guides.

The organization shall deduct, on a permanent impairment multiplier basis, from an award for impairment under this section, any previous impairment award under the workers’ compensation laws of any jurisdiction.

An injured employee is not entitled to a permanent impairment award due solely to pain.

Other than an award identified in subsection 11, an award may not be issued unless specifically identified and quantified within the sixth edition of the American medical association’s “Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment”.

If an employee dies, the right to any compensation payable pursuant to an impairment evaluation previously requested by the employee under subsection 2, which remains unpaid on the date of the employee’s death, survives and passes to the employee’s dependent spouse, minor children, parents, or estate, in that order. If the employee dies, only those findings of impairment which are objectively verifiable such as values for surgical procedures and amputations may be considered in a rating for impairment. Impairment findings not supported by objectively verifiable evidence may not be included in a rating for impairment. The deceased employee’s dependents or representatives shall request an impairment award under this subsection within one year from the date of death of the employee.

If the injury causes permanent impairment, the award must be determined based on the percentage of whole body impairment in accordance with the following schedule:

An amputation of a finger or toe at the level of the distal interphalangeal joint or proximal to that joint, or the thumb or the great toe at the interphalangeal joint or proximal to that joint, which is determined to result in a whole body impairment of less than fourteen percent and which is not identified in the following schedule, is payable as a fourteen percent impairment. If an evaluation for the loss of an eye or for an amputation results in an award that is less than the permanent impairment multiplier identified in the following schedule, the organization shall pay an award equal to the permanent impairment multiplier set out in the following schedule:

If there is a medical dispute regarding the percentage of an injured employee’s permanent impairment, all relevant medical evidence must be submitted to an independent health care provider who has not treated the employee and who has not been consulted by the organization in relation to the injury upon which the impairment is based. The organization shall establish a list of health care providers who have the training and experience necessary to conduct an evaluation of permanent impairment and to apply the sixth edition of the American medical association’s “Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment”. The organization shall define, by rule, the process by which the organization shall choose an independent health care provider or health care providers to review a disputed permanent impairment evaluation or rating. The decision of the independent health care provider or health care providers chosen under this process is presumptive evidence of the degree of permanent impairment of the employee which can only be rebutted by clear and convincing evidence. This subsection does not impose liability on the organization for an impairment award for a rating of impairment for a body part or condition the organization has not determined to be compensable as a result of the injury. The employee bears the expense of witness fees of the independent health care provider or health care providers if the employee disputes the findings of the independent health care provider or health care providers.

An attorney’s fees are not payable unless there is a bona fide dispute as to the percentage of the employee’s permanent impairment or unless there is a dispute as to the employee’s eligibility for an award for permanent partial impairment. An attorney’s fees payable in connection with a permanent impairment dispute may not exceed twenty percent of the additional amount awarded upon final resolution of the dispute, subject to the maximum fees established pursuant to section 65-02-08.

An attorney may not seek or obtain from an employee through a contingent fee arrangement, or on a percentage basis, costs or fees payable in connection with the award or denial of compensation for permanent impairment. A permanent impairment award is exempt from the claims of creditors, including an employee’s attorney, except as provided by section 65-05-29.

If an injured employee qualifies for an additional award and the prior award was based upon the number of weeks, the impairment multiplier must be used to compare against the prior award of weeks in determining any additional award.

Impairment: Permanent impairment multiplier of: 1 to 13 percent 0 14 percent 10 15 percent 10 16 percent 15 17 percent 15 18 percent 20 19 percent 20 20 percent 25 21 percent 25 22 percent 30 23 percent 30 24 percent 30 25 percent 35 26 percent 35 27 percent 35 28 percent 40 29 percent 45 30 percent 50 31 percent 60 32 percent 70 33 percent 80 34 percent 90 35 percent 100 36 percent 110 37 percent 120 38 percent 130 39 percent 140 40 percent 150 41 percent 160 42 percent 170 43 percent 180 44 percent 190 45 percent 200 46 percent 210 47 percent 220 48 percent 230 49 percent 240 50 percent 260 51 percent 280 52 percent 300 53 percent 320 54 percent 340 55 percent 360 56 percent 380 57 percent 400 58 percent 420 59 percent 440 60 percent 465 61 percent 490 62 percent 515 63 percent 540 64 percent 565 65 percent 590 66 percent 615 67 percent 640 68 percent 665 69 percent 690 70 percent 715 71 percent 740 72 percent 765 73 percent 790 74 percent 815 75 percent 840 76 percent 865 77 percent 890 78 percent 915 79 percent 940 80 percent 965 81 percent 990 82 percent 1015 83 percent 1040 84 percent 1065 85 percent 1090 86 percent 1115 87 percent 1140 88 percent 1165 89 percent 1190 90 percent 1215 91 percent 1240 92 percent 1265 93 percent 1290 94 percent 1320 95 percent 1350 96 percent 1380 97 percent 1410 98 percent 1440 99 percent 1470 100 percent 1500

Click to view

For amputation of: Permanent impairment multiplier of: A thumb 65 The second or distal phalanx of the thumb 28 The first finger 40 The middle or second phalanx of the first finger 28 The third or distal phalanx of the first finger 22 The second finger 30 The middle or second phalanx of the second finger 22 The third or distal phalanx of the second finger 14 The third finger 20 The middle or second phalanx of the third finger 16 The fourth finger 16 The middle or second phalanx of the fourth finger 12 The leg at the hip 234 The leg at or above the knee 195 The leg at or above the ankle 150 A great toe 30 The second or distal phalanx of the great toe 18 Any other toe 12 For loss of: Permanent impairment multiplier of: An eye 150 Vision of an eye which equals or exceeds 20/200 corrected 100

Click to view

The award for the amputation of more than one finger of one hand may not exceed an award for the amputation of a hand. The award for the amputation of more than one toe of one foot may not exceed an award for the amputation of a foot. If any of the amputations or losses set out in this subsection combine with other impairments for the same work-related injury or condition, the organization shall issue an impairment award based on the greater of the permanent impairment multiplier allowed for the combined rating established under the sixth edition of the American medical association’s “Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment” or the permanent impairment multiplier set forth in this subsection.

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 624, § 1; 1999, ch. 551, § 2; 2001, ch. 580, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2007, ch. 573, § 1; 2009, ch. 622, § 1; 2011, ch. 511, § 1; 2013, ch. 499, § 6; 2019, ch. 523, §§ 10, 11, effective August 1, 2019.

65-05-13.
Scheduled injuries — Permanent loss of member — Compensation — Time compensation payable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 624, § 2.

65-05-14.
Scheduled injuries — Partial loss of use of member — Weekly compensation time — Compensation payable. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1995, ch. 624, § 2.

65-05-15.
Aggravation awards.

When a compensable injury combines with a noncompensable injury, disease, or other condition, the organization shall award benefits on an aggravation basis, on the following terms:

In cases of a prior injury, disease, or other condition, known in advance of the work injury, which has caused previous work restriction or interference with physical function the progression of which is substantially accelerated by, or the severity of which is substantially worsened by, a compensable injury, the organization shall pay benefits during the period of acute care in full. The period of acute care is presumed to be sixty days immediately following the compensable injury, absent clear and convincing evidence to the contrary. Following the period of acute care, the organization shall pay benefits on an aggravation basis.

If the progression of a prior compensable injury is substantially accelerated by, or the severity of the compensable injury is substantially worsened by a noncompensable injury, disease, or other condition, the organization shall pay benefits on an aggravation basis.

The organization shall pay benefits on an aggravation basis as a percentage of the benefits to which the injured worker would otherwise be entitled, equal to the percentage of cause of the resulting condition that is attributable to the compensable injury. Benefits payable on an aggravation basis are presumed to be payable on a fifty percent basis. The party asserting a percentage other than the presumed fifty percent may rebut the presumption with clear and convincing evidence to the contrary.

When an injured worker is entitled to benefits on an aggravation basis, the organization shall still pay costs of vocational rehabilitation, burial expenses under section 65-05-26, travel, other personal reimbursement for seeking and obtaining medical care under section 65-05-28, and dependency allowance on a one hundred percent basis.

Source:

S.L. 1931, ch. 312, § 1; 1939, ch. 251, § 5; 1943, ch. 274, § 11; R.C. 1943, § 65-0515; S.L. 1953, ch. 353, § 6; 1957 Supp., § 65-0515; S.L. 1977, ch. 579, § 14; 1981, ch. 643, § 5; 1989, ch. 766, § 5; 1997, ch. 544, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2009, ch. 619, § 5.

65-05-16.
Death benefits payable.

The organization may pay benefits under this chapter in the case of the death of an injured employee as the direct result of an injury sustained in the course of the injured employee’s employment when:

If there has been no disability preceding death, the death occurs within one year after the date of the injury;

If there has been disability preceding death, the death occurs within one year after the cessation of disability resulting from the injury;

If there has been disability that has continued to the time of death, the death occurs within six years after the date of injury; or

If there has been disability that has continued to the time of death, the death occurs more than six years after the date of injury, and the injured employee has been designated catastrophically injured as defined under section 65-05.1-06.1.

The organization may not pay death benefits unless a claim is submitted within two years of the death and:

The death is a direct result of an accepted compensable injury; or

If a claim was not submitted by the deceased, the claim for death benefits is submitted within two years of the injury.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 3, subs. G; 1921, ch. 141, § 1, subs. G; 1925, ch. 223, § 1, subs. G; 1925 Supp., § 396a3, subs. G; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1, subs. G; 1929, ch. 260, § 1, subs. G; 1935, ch. 286, § 2, subs. G; 1939, ch. 251, § 1, subs. G; 1943, ch. 274, § 6; R.C. 1943, § 65-0516; S.L. 1977, ch. 579, § 15; 1979, ch. 652, § 2; 1997, ch. 545, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2007, ch. 570, § 3.

65-05-17.
Weekly compensation allowances for death claims.

If death results from an injury under the conditions specified in section 65-05-16, the fund shall pay to the following persons, for the periods specified:

To the decedent’s spouse or to the guardian of the children of the decedent, an amount equal to the benefit rate for total disability under section 65-05-09. All recipients of benefits under this subsection are eligible for benefits at the rate provided in this section, regardless of the date of death of the deceased employee. These benefits continue until the death of the decedent’s spouse; or, if the surviving children of the decedent are under the care of a guardian, until those children no longer meet the definition of child in this title. If there is more than one guardian for the children who survive the decedent, the organization shall divide the death benefits equally among the children and shall pay benefits to the children’s guardians. Total death benefits, including supplementary benefits, paid on any one claim may not exceed three hundred thousand dollars.

To each child of the deceased employee, the amount of fifteen dollars per week. This rate must be paid to each eligible child regardless of the date of death. The organization may pay the benefit directly to the child of the deceased employee or to the surviving parent or guardian of the child. Dependency allowance may not be reduced by the percentage of aggravation.

In addition to the payments provided under subsections 1 and 2, a payment in the sum of two thousand five hundred dollars to the decedent’s spouse or the guardian of the children of the decedent and eight hundred dollars for each dependent child. If there is more than one guardian of the decedent’s surviving children, the two thousand five hundred dollars must be divided equally among the children and paid to the children’s guardians.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 3, subs. G, subds. a to g, k; 1921, ch. 141, § 1, subs. G, subds. a to g, k; 1925, ch. 223, § 1, subs. G, subds. a to g, k; 1925 Supp., § 396a3, subs. G, subds. a to g, k; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1, subs. G, subds. a to g, k; 1929, ch. 260, § 1, subs. G, subds. a to g, k; 1935, ch. 286, § 2, subs. G; 1939, ch. 251, § 1, subs. G, subds. a to g, k; 1943, ch. 274, §§ 7, 8; R.C. 1943, § 65-0517; S.L. 1945, ch. 337, § 6; 1949, ch. 354, § 9; 1953, ch. 353, § 7; 1955, ch. 354, § 14; 1957 Supp., § 65-0517; S.L. 1959, ch. 421, § 3; 1965, ch. 457, § 1; 1967, ch. 484, § 7; 1973, ch. 507, § 1; 1975, ch. 582, § 1; 1977, ch. 579, § 16; 1979, ch. 652, § 3; 1979, ch. 653, § 1; 1981, ch. 643, § 6; 1983, ch. 700, § 3; 1985, ch. 685, § 4; 1985, ch. 688, § 2; 1987, ch. 754, § 1; 1989, ch. 295, § 15; 1989, ch. 766, § 6; 1997, ch. 545, § 2; 1999, ch. 557, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 562, § 7; 2009, ch. 619, § 6.

65-05-18.
Provisions of section 65-05-17 retroactive. [Repealed]

Repealed by omission from this code.

65-05-19.
Providing nondependency payments in certain cases.

If the death of an employee with no surviving spouse or dependent children results from an injury within the time specified in section 65-05-16, the organization shall pay a lump sum equal to five percent of the maximum total death benefits specified in subsection 1 of section 65-05-17 to the surviving nondependent child, or in equal shares to the surviving nondependent children. In the event that no nondependent child is living, the sum provided under this section must be paid in equal shares to the surviving parents of the deceased, and if there are none, then to the deceased employee’s living brothers and sisters. If there are no living brothers or sisters, the sum under this section must be paid in equal shares to the surviving grandparents, if any, of the deceased employee.

Source:

S.L. 1941, ch. 306, § 1; R.C. 1943, § 65-0519; S.L. 1969, ch. 565, § 1; 1973, ch. 508, § 1; 1975, ch. 583, § 1; 1977, ch. 579, § 17; 1983, ch. 699, § 4; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 609, § 1.

65-05-20.
Dependents have option of accepting amount of nondependency payments in lieu of dependency compensation. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1969, ch. 565, § 2.

65-05-20.1.
Scholarship fund — Rules.

The organization may establish a scholarship fund. Scholarships may be awarded to:

The spouse and child of a worker who dies as a result of a compensable work-related injury, if the spouse and child have received benefits under section 65-05-17;

The spouse and child of a worker who is deemed to be catastrophically injured as defined in subdivision c of subsection 2 of section 65-05.1-06.1; and

Injured workers for whom the organization determines a scholarship would be beneficial and appropriate because of exceptional circumstances, or upon successful completion of a rehabilitation program contemplated under subdivision g of subsection 4 of section 65-05.1-01, as determined by the organization.

For purposes of this section, child includes a legitimate child, a step child, adopted child, posthumous child, foster child, and acknowledged illegitimate child between twenty-three and twenty-six years of age who is enrolled as a full-time student in any accredited educational institution and is dependent upon the employee for support.

Scholarships are payable to an accredited institution of higher education or an institution of technical education on behalf of a student attending that institution.

The total amount awarded annually in scholarships may not exceed five hundred thousand dollars. The maximum amount payable on behalf of an applicant is ten thousand dollars per year for no more than five years, except that the combined retraining and scholarship periods for applicants successfully completing a rehabilitation program under subdivision g of subsection 4 of section 65-05.1-01 may not exceed five years.

Scholarships must be awarded by a panel chosen by the organization. The organization shall adopt rules establishing selection criteria and obligations associated with the program and identifying information an applicant is required to submit to determine an appropriate scholarship award. Scholarships may be awarded at the sole discretion of the organization. There is no right to reconsideration, rehearing, or appeal from any decision regarding the award, denial, or amount of a scholarship.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 545, § 3; 1999, ch. 557, § 2; 2001, ch. 581, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2005, ch. 610, § 3; 2011, ch. 512, § 4; 2015, ch. 480, § 4, effective August 1, 2015.

65-05-21.
Marriage settlement to spouse.

If a spouse who receives compensation under the provisions of subsection 1 of section 65-05-17 remarries, there shall be paid to such spouse a lump sum equal to one hundred four weeks’ compensation. If, prior to such marriage, such spouse has received a partial lump sum settlement which covers all or any portion of the said one hundred four weeks following such spouse’s marriage, the amount of such partial lump sum settlement which covers all or any part of the said one hundred four weeks following such spouse’s marriage shall be deducted from such marriage settlement, and the spouse shall receive only the remainder, if any, over and above such deduction. Any judgment annulling such marriage shall not reinstate the right of such spouse to compensation if the action for annulment is instituted more than six months after the marriage. The provisions of this section apply only to remarriages that occur before August 1, 2003, regardless of the date of injury or date of death of the decedent.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 3, subs. G, subd. a; 1921, ch. 141, § 1, subs. G, subd. a; 1925, ch. 223, § 1, subs. G, subd. a; 1925 Supp., § 396a3, subs. G, subd. a; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1, subs. G, subd. a; 1929, ch. 260, § 1, subs. G, subd. a; 1939, ch. 251, § 1, subs. G, subd. a; R.C. 1943, § 65-0521; S.L. 1973, ch. 509, § 1; 1977, ch. 579, § 18; 2003, ch. 562, § 8.

65-05-22.
Adjustment on cessation of compensation for death to one beneficiary.

Upon the cessation of compensation payable to a beneficiary under the provisions of this chapter, the compensation of the remaining persons entitled to compensation for the unexpired part of the period during which their compensation is payable, shall be that which such persons would have received if they had been the only persons entitled to compensation at the time of the decedent’s death.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 3, subs. G, subd. h; 1921, ch. 141, § 1, subs. G, subd. h; 1925, ch. 223, § 1, subs. G, subd. h; 1925 Supp., § 396a3, subs. G, subd. h; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1, subs. G, subd. h; 1929, ch. 260, § 1, subs. G, subd. h; 1939, ch. 251, § 1, subs. G, subd. h; R.C. 1943, § 65-0522; 2003, ch. 562, § 9.

65-05-23.
Organization may modify apportionment of benefits in certain cases. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1997, ch. 545, § 6.

65-05-24.
Accepting compensation after marriage — Penalty. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2003, ch. 562, § 13.

65-05-25.
Lump sum settlements — Granted in discretion of organization — How computed.

If an employee is determined to be permanently and totally disabled, the organization may pay the employee a lump sum equal to the present value of all future payments of compensation. The probability of the employee’s death before the expiration of the period during which the employee is entitled to compensation must be determined by generally accepted mortality studies. The organization may not pay the employee a lump sum unless it has first determined that there is clear and convincing evidence that the lump sum payment is in the best interest of the employee. Best interest of the employee may not be deemed to exist because the employee can invest the lump sum in another manner to realize a better yield. The employee must show a specific plan of rehabilitation which will enable the employee to return as a productive member of society.

The organization and an employee may compromise to resolve a disputed claim. The contract of settlement made is enforceable by the parties. The contract may provide that the employee shall utilize the funds to engage in certain rehabilitation programs. If the employee breaches the contract, the organization may require the employee to repay the benefits received under the agreement. In cases in which the extent of disability is disputed and resolved by agreement, the concept of reopening a disability claim due to significant change in medical condition is inapplicable.

If death results from an injury under the conditions specified in section 65-05-16, the organization may pay the decedent’s spouse or the guardian of the decedent’s children a lump sum equal to the present value of all future payments of compensation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, structured settlements may be used to resolve a dispute or to provide for payment of ongoing future benefits. The organization may contract with a third-party vendor to provide structured settlement payments.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 3, subs. H; 1921, ch. 141, § 1, subs. H; 1925, ch. 223, § 1, subs. H; 1925 Supp., § 396a3, subs. H; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1, subs. G, subd. 1; 1929, ch. 260, § 1, subs. G, subd. 1; 1935, ch. 286, § 2, subs. G, subd. 1; 1939, ch. 251, § 1, subs. G, subd. 1; 1943, ch. 274, § 9; R.C. 1943, § 65-0525; S.L. 1945, ch. 337, § 7; 1957 Supp., § 65-0525; S.L. 1967, ch. 486, § 1; 1969, ch. 566, § 1; 1977, ch. 579, § 19; 1981, ch. 643, § 7; 1989, ch. 766, § 7; 1991, ch. 714, § 49; 1993, ch. 614, § 11; 2003, ch. 561, § 3; 2003, ch. 562, § 10; 2005, ch. 610, § 4.

65-05-26.
Burial expenses.

If death benefits are payable under section 65-05-16, the fund shall pay to the facility handling the funeral arrangements of the deceased employee burial expenses not to exceed ten thousand dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1919, ch. 162, § 3, subs. I; 1921, ch. 141, § 1, subs. I; 1925, ch. 223, § 1, subs. I; 1925 Supp., § 396a3, subs. I; S.L. 1927, ch. 286, § 1, subs. G, subd. m; 1929, ch. 260, § 1, subs. G, subd. m; 1939, ch. 251, § 1, subs. G, subd. m; 1943, ch. 274, § 10; R.C. 1943, § 65-0526; S.L. 1945, ch. 337, § 8; 1949, ch. 354, § 10; 1957 Supp., § 65-0526; S.L. 1967, ch. 484, § 8; 1973, ch. 511, § 1; 1977, ch. 579, § 20; 1981, ch. 643, § 8; 1983, ch. 700, § 4; 1997, ch. 545, § 4; 1999, ch. 557, § 3; 2009, ch. 619, § 7.

65-05-27.
Organization without probate proceedings may pay spouse of deceased claimant sum due deceased — Maximum payment.

If a compensation claimant dies, the organization, without probate proceedings, may pay to the spouse of such claimant, if living, or in the event of the claimant’s spouse’s death or incompetency, to any adult person who has assumed or paid the expenses of the last illness or funeral expense of the said claimant, the amount actually due claimant’s estate, not to exceed the sum of one thousand dollars.

Source:

S.L. 1939, ch. 251, § 1, subs. G, subd. o; 1941, ch. 305, § 3; R.C. 1943, § 65-0527; S.L. 1949, ch. 354, § 11; 1957 Supp., § 65-0527; S.L. 1959, ch. 422, § 1; 1973, ch. 512, § 1; 2003, ch. 561, § 3.